Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-804.01
Prostitution cases; incriminating testimony; how treated.

In all cases arising under sections 28-801 to 28-804, no person shall be excused from testifying against another person by reason of such testimony tending to incriminate the person testifying, but the testimony so given, unless voluntary, shall in no case be used against the person so testifying in any criminal prosecution or otherwise.

Laws 1978, LB 618, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 1086, § 9.